Tables/Contraction/de-2015.ctb
# names
sufword aaron =
word abbey =
word angela 235-1245-13456-1 shouldn't use the ge-contraction
word angeles 235-1245-13456-123456 shouldn't use the ge-contraction
word angelika 235-1245-13456-24-13-1 shouldn't use the ge-contraction
word angelina 235-1245-13456-35-1 shouldn't use the ge-contraction
word angelo 235-1245-13456-135 shouldn't use the ge-contraction
always aristotel 356-24-23456-135-2345-13456
always daniel 145-235-24-13456 shouldn't use the ie-contraction
always gabriel 1245-1-12-1235-24-13456 shouldn't use the ie-contraction
always gabriell 1245-1-12-1235-24-15-12345 shouldn't use the ie-contraction
sufword gerald 1245-12456-25-145
always gerlind 1245-12456-123-35-145 should use the er-contraction
always solveig 234-135-123-1235-146-1245 shouldn't use the so-contraction

always gasstrom 1245-1-234-23456-1235-135-134
always sinusstrom 234-35-136-234-23456-1235-135-134

endword stisch 234-2345-24-156
endword stische 234-2345-24-156-15
endword stischen 234-2345-24-156-14
endword stisches 234-2345-24-156-123456
endword stischs 234-2345-24-156-234
always agnostisch 1-1245-1345-135-23456-24-156
always akustisch 1-13-136-23456-24-156
always anankastisch 235-235-13-1-23456-24-156
always blastisch 12-123-1-23456-24-156
always bombastisch 12-135-134-12-1-23456-24-156
always chiastisch 1456-24-1-23456-24-156
always cineastisch 6-14-35-15-1-23456-24-156
always diagnostisch 145-24-1-1245-1345-135-23456-24-156
always doxastisch 145-135-6-1346-1-23456-24-156
always drastisch 145-1235-1-23456-24-156
always dynastisch 145-6-13456-1345-1-23456-24-156
always elastisch 13456-1-23456-24-156
always fantastisch 124-235-2345-1-23456-24-156
always faustisch 124-16-23456-24-156
always gespenstisch 12346-234-1234-14-23456-24-156
always gnostisch 1245-1345-135-23456-24-156
always gymnastisch 1245-6-13456-134-1345-1-23456-24-156
always ikonoklastisch 24-13-135-1345-135-13-123-1-23456-24-156
always kataklystisch 13-1-2345-1-13-123-6-13456-23456-24-156
always kaustisch 13-16-23456-24-156
always klastisch 13-123-1-23456-24-156
always monastisch 134-135-1345-1-23456-24-156
always marastisch 134-356-1-23456-24-156
always mystisch 134-6-13456-23456-24-156
always periphrastisch 1234-12456-24-1234-125-1235-1-23456-24-156
always plastisch 1234-123-1-23456-24-156
always pleonastisch 1234-123-15-135-1345-1-23456-24-156
always orgastisch 26-1245-1-23456-24-156
always orgiastisch 26-1245-24-1-23456-24-156
always phantastisch 1234-125-235-2345-1-23456-24-156
sufword prognostisch 12345-1245-1345-135-23456-24-156
always sarkastisch 234-356-13-1-23456-24-156
always scholastisch 156-135-123-1-23456-24-156
always spastisch 234-1234-1-23456-24-156
always stochastisch 23456-135-1456-1-23456-24-156
endword sterror 234-2345-12456-1235-135-1235
always sterror 234-2345-12456-1235-26
before e always sterrass 234-2345-12456-1235-1-2346
before e always monsterrass 134-135-1345-23456-12456-1235-1-2346
before e always stribün =
before e always strepp =
before e always strupp =
prfword stür 234-2345-1256-1235
prfword stüren 234-2345-1256-1235-14
before aeu midendword stast 234-2345-1-23456
always schrist 234-1456-1235-24-23456

# TODO:
# 8-Punkte-Plan

# inline contraction of emoji descriptions
emoji de
